Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3403
Information, interviews, reports, statements, data; privileged communications; not received in evidence.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data furnished by reason of sections 71-3401 to 71-3403 and any findings or conclusions resulting from such studies are declared to be privileged communications which may not be used or offered or received in evidence in any legal proceeding of any kind or character, and any attempt to use or offer any such information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data, findings or conclusions or any part thereof, unless waived by the interested parties, shall constitute prejudicial error resulting in a mistrial in any such proceeding.

Laws 1961, c. 347, § 3, p. 1106.